Massachusetts, session 194th, H3865.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 59 of chapter 33 is hereby amended by striking out subsection (e) and inserting in
place thereof the following paragraph:-
(e) An employee of a county, city or town shall be entitled to the benefits and protections
of this section or the benefits of the accepted earlier law.
of 1